Washington statutes.
RCW 42.60.020

Prohibitions—Government agencies and public employees.

A state or local government agency or public employee shall not:

(1) Provide or disclose to federal government authorities personally identifiable information regarding the religious beliefs, practices, or affiliation of any individual, except where the employee is a witness to a crime;

(2) Use public funds, facilities, property, equipment, or personnel to assist in creation, implementation, or enforcement of any government program compiling a list, registry, or database of personally identifiable information about individuals based on religious beliefs, practice, or affiliation, for law enforcement or immigration purposes; or

(3) Make personally identifiable information from agency databases available, including any databases maintained by private vendors contracting with the agency, to anyone or any entity for the purpose of investigation or enforcement under any government program compiling a list, registry, or database of individuals based on religious belief, practice, or affiliation, or national origin, or ethnicity for law enforcement or immigration purposes.

[ 2018 c 303 s 3.]